District of Columbia statutes.
8-1773.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Commission” means the Public Service Commission.

(2)

“District Department of the Environment,” “DDOE,” or “Energy Office” means the District Department of the Environment Energy Office.

(3)

“Electric company” shall have the same meaning as in § 34-207.

(4)

“Energy Assistance Trust Fund” or “EATF” means the Energy Assistance Trust Fund established under § 8-1774.11.

(4A)

“ENERGY STAR Portfolio Manager” means the ENERGY STAR Portfolio Manager tool developed by the Environmental Protection Agency, or any alternative approved by the Mayor that rates the performance of a qualifying building, relative to similar buildings nationwide, accounting for the impacts of year-to-year weather variations, building size, location, and several operating characteristics, using the Environmental Protection Agency’s national energy performance rating system.

(5)

“Existing electricity programs” means those programs operated by the District Department of the Environment under the names “Weatherization Plus,” “Low Income Appliance Replacement Program,” and “Weatherization and Rehabilitation.”

(6)

“Existing low-income program” means the program operated under the name “LIHEAP Expansion and Energy Education”.

(7)

“Existing natural gas programs” means those programs proposed or operated by the District Department of the Environment under the names “Heating System Repair, Replacement, and Tune-Up Program,” “Residential Weatherization and Efficiency Program,” “Energy Awareness Program”. and “Saving Energy in D.C. Schools.”

(8)

“Fiscal Agent” means the Office of the Chief Financial Officer.

(9)

“Gas company” shall have the same meaning as in § 34-209.

(10)

“Green-collar jobs” means jobs in the environmental sector of the economy which jobs may involve the implementation of environmentally-conscious design, policy, or technology.

(11)

“OIML” means the International Association of Legal Metrology.

(12)

“Request for Proposals” or “RFP” means the request for proposals prepared by the District Department of the Environment for the SEU.

(13)

“Residential Aid Discount” means the utility discount program offered by the electric company to low-income electricity customers in the District of Columbia.

(14)

“Residential Essential Service” means the utility discount program offered by the gas company to low-income natural gas customers in the District of Columbia.

(15)

“Solar thermal systems” means systems which utilize the sun’s radiation to efficiently heat fluids or air.

(16)

“SRCC” means the Solar Rating and Certification Corporation.

(17)

“Substantial improvement” has the same meaning as in section 202 of Title 12J of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (12J DCMR § 202).

(18)

“Sustainable Energy Trust Fund” or “SETF” means the Sustainable Energy Trust Fund established under § 8-1774.10.

(19)

“Sustainable Energy Utility” or “SEU” means the private contractor selected to develop, coordinate, and provide programs for the purpose of promoting the sustainable use of energy in the District of Columbia.

(20)

“Sustainable Energy Utility Advisory Board”, “Advisory Board”, or “Board” means the board established under § 8-1774.03 that advises the DDOE on the procurement of the contract with the SEU and monitors the progress of the SEU under its contract.

(21)

“Temporary electricity programs” means those programs operated by the District Department of the Environment under the names “Affordable Housing Energy Efficient Rebate Program”, “Weatherization Rehabilitation Asset Partnership”, and “Home Energy Rating System”.

(22)

“Utility or energy company” means a company distributing, supplying, or transmitting electricity or natural gas in the District of Columbia.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-250, § 101, 55 DCR 9225
July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-195, § 2(a), 57 DCR 4519
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 62(a), 59 DCR 6190
Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-142, § 101(a), 61 DCR 8045
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 2102(a), 61 DCR 9990
D.C. Law 18-195 rewrote par. (6), which had read as follows: “(6) ‘Existing low-income programs’ means those programs operated by the District Department of the Environment under the names ‘LIHEAP Expansion and Energy Education,’ ‘RAD Expansion,’ ‘RAD Arrearages Retirement and Education Program,’ and ‘Residential Essential Service Expansion and Awareness Program’.”
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Green-collar” for “Green collar” in (10); and validated previously made technical corrections in (3) and (22).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-142 added (4A).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 rewrote (6).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 101 of Clean and Affordable Energy Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-508, September 25, 2008, 55 DCR 10856).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Residential Aid Discount Subsidy Stabilization Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-398, May 10, 2010, 57 DCR 4362).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2102(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2102(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2102(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Section 801 of D.C. Law 17-250 provided: “Sec. 801. Applicability. This act shall apply on the later of October 1, 2008, or the effective date of this act.”

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-142: Section 502(a) of D.C. Law 20-142 provided that Title I of the act, §§ 101-111, shall apply as of January 1, 2015.